Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,133
Criminal
prosecution; Attorney General; concurrent jurisdiction with county attorney.

The Attorney General has jurisdiction to enforce the criminal
provisions of the Nebraska Political Accountability
and Disclosure Act. The county attorney of the county in which a violation
of the act occurs shall have concurrent
jurisdiction.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 133;

Laws 1981, LB 134, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 758, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB464, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 35.